src/fst/phonology.twolc
!old a rules "a:0 before Pret and Pl i when rounded root vowel"
!old a rules !! __@RULENAME@__
!old a rules
!old a rules a:0 <=> (\a) [(u) u|([u|o]) o] (i) Cns: (Cns:) (Cns:) _  [(Dummy:* - %^AE:) %>  [i2:|i3:] | [a:0]] ;
!old a rules
!old a rules !a:0 <=> \a [(u) u|([u|o]) o] (i) Cns: (Cns:) (Cns:) _  ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) %> !Dummy:* [i2:|i3:] ;
!old a rules ! a:0 <=>          [u|o]     (i) Cns: (Cns:) (Cns:) _ (Dummy:) %> [i2:|i3:] ;
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules !!€ otta^WG>i2n
!old a rules !!€ o0t000in
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules "a:o before Pl i and Pret i"
!old a rules !! __@RULENAME@__
!old a rules !a:o <=> .#. (Cns:*) [i|e|a] \o \u Cns:* (:Cns) %> %^AO:o a:o _ %> [i2:i | i3:i ] ; ! 2-syll
!old a rules a:o <=> .#. (Cns:*) [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) (%^AO:0) _  %> [i2: | i3: ] ; !2-syll
!old a rules
!old a rules !a:o / <= .#. (Cns:*) [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) %^AO:0 _ %> i [a:a] ; !2-syll
!old a rules
!old a rules !"a never o in front of i:i"
!old a rules !! __@RULENAME@__
!old a rules !a:o /<= (.#.) (Cns:*) a:a (\%>) _  i:i ;
!old a rules
!old a rules !a:o /<= a _ (\%>) i ;
!old a rules
!old a rules        ! .#. Cns:* [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) [Dummy: - %^AE:] _ %^AO:0 [ i2:| i3: ] ;
!old a rules ! Vow Cns Cns:* [Vow: - [o|u]] [i|e|a] Cns:+ (:Cns)[Dummy: - %^AE:] _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> [i2: | i3:] ; !3-syll
!old a rules
!old a rules ! a:o <=>  .#. Cns:* ([Vow: - [a|o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> !i2: ; ! 2-syll
!old a rules !          .#. Cns:* ([Vow: - [a|o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) _  %^AO:0 ;
!old a rules !    Vow Cns Cns:* ([Vow  - [a|o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:+ (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> i2: ; ! 3-syll
!old a rules !    Vow Cns Cns:* ([Vow  - [a|o|u]]) Vow   Cns:+ (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> i2: ; ! 3-syll
!old a rules !          .#. Cns:*   a                  ([a|u]) Cns:* (:Cns) _ [Dummy: - %^AE:] %> i3: ;
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules !!€ kal0a>i2en
!old a rules !!€ kallo0ien
!old a rules
!old a rules
!old a rules !!€ kulkkiija>i2
!old a rules !!€ kulkkiijo0i
!old a rules
!old a rules !"a:o for HMETA"
!old a rules ! %^V:o <=> .#. Cns:* a ([a|u]) Cns:* (:Cns) [Dummy: - %^AE:] %^HMETA: 0%> h _ %^AO:0 ;



!"Gemination"
! 0:Cx <=> [Vow|l|r] Cy _ Vow: %> Vow: ;
!        where Cy in ( h j k l m n p r s t v )
!              Cx in ( h j k l m n p r s t v )
!    matched;

!"Gemination of h"
!0:h <=> [ .#. | Cns ] Vow h _ :Vx %> :Vx ;
!         where Vx in ( a e i o u ä ö ) ;
!
!"Gemination of l"
!0:l <=> [ .#. | Cns ] Vow h _ :Vx %> :Vx ;
!         where Vx in ( a e i o u ä ö ) ;


!   "Gemination VVXi"
!0:Cx <=> Cns:*  Vow:+ (Vow) Cx _ [ Vow | a:o ] %> [:i | i2:i];
!                                         _ [ a:0 | e:0 ]  %> :i i2:i ;
!      where Cx in ( k p t s ) ;

! "a:o before Pl i and Pret i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
!a:o <=>        .#.   (Cns:*) ([Vow: - [o|u]]) [i|e|a] Cns:* (:Cns) (%^AO:0) _                    %> [i2: | i3: ] ; !2-syll
! a:o <=>  [ #: | .#. ] Cns:* ([i|e|a]         ) [i|e|a] Cns:*  :Cns           _ (Dummy: - %^AE:0) %> [i2: | i3: ] ;
!  a:o <=>               Cns:* ([i|e|a]         ) [i|e|a] Cns:*  :Cns          _ (Dummy: - %^AE:0) %> [i2: | i3: ] ;
!                                                  (:Cns) [ :k | :l] (:i) :i :j _ (Dummy:*) i2: ;





!"Shortening of long vowel when vowel lengthening"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! %^V:0 <=> Vow %> _ %> [ i3:i | i4:i ] ;

! Tämä sääntö aiheuttaa paljon ratkaisemattomia konflikteja säännön "Vow copying" kanssa.
! Mikä tämä sääntö on ja miten se eroaa edelisestä "Shortening of long vowel in front of i"?
! soppiit: sopi: sopisi
! juttaat: juti : jutaisi?
! saa∂a: sai : saisin
! jää∂ä : jäin : jäisin
! Poistettu toistaiseksi


!"a deletion in h-illative of a-stems"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! a:0 <=> Cns _ %^AO: %^HMETA: 0%> h %^V: i2: ;

! oppettaajhiin
